Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 2 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE LAW
§ 56-233. Procedure for disbursement of funds to recipients.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 56-405 and section 56-406, Idaho Code, any such contract entered into between the designated and responsible governmental agency and an independent contractor for the administration of such medical assistance programs may set forth therein a procedure for the disbursement of funds to the recipients of such program and, upon the approval of the procedures so established by the state controller, disbursements of funds shall be made by the state of Idaho to the independent contractor and by the independent contractor to the recipients in accordance with the procedures so established. Procedures established by contract for the disbursement of funds shall have reference only to such funds as involve the participation of the federal government under the provisions of title XIX of the Social Security Act of 1965, as amended.

§ 56-233a. Costs of nonfederal share of skilled and intermediate nursing care for medically eligible persons

Source of payment. [Repealed.]

§ 56-234. Legislative intent.

It is hereby declared by the legislature that, in keeping with current state and national goals and best practice, increasing numbers of persons with developmental disabilities are being discharged to community facilities or private residences as an alternative to large public institutions licensed as intermediate care facilities for persons with intellectual disabilities. Such deinstitutionalization is highly desirable since it can lead to a fuller, richer and more independent life for persons with developmental disabilities. Recognizing that every individual has unique needs and differing abilities, the purpose of the following provisions is to clarify the department of health and welfare’s duties and responsibilities with respect to persons with developmental disabilities, who are or may become residents of the southwest Idaho treatment center, a public institution licensed for nine (9) or more beds as an intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities. The following provisions shall be liberally construed to accomplish these purposes.

§ 56-234A. Definitions.

As used in sections 56-234 through 56-235E, Idaho Code:

“Admission-discharge committee” means an interdisciplinary team of at least three (3) individuals designated by the director to evaluate persons as required by the provisions of sections 56-234 through 56-235E, Idaho Code. Each committee member must be specially qualified by training and experience in the diagnosis and treatment of persons with a developmental disability.

“Certified family home” means a family home as defined in section 39-3502, Idaho Code.

“Community facility” means a privately owned or operated nursing facility, intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities, licensed residential or assisted living facility, other organization licensed, recognized, or certified by the department to provide care or treatment to persons with developmental disabilities, or a publicly owned or operated facility licensed for eight (8) beds or less as an intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities.

“Department” means the Idaho department of health and welfare.

“Developmental disabilities” means a chronic disability of a person as defined in section 66-402, Idaho Code.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho department of health and welfare or his designee.

“Discharge” means an admission-discharge committee has determined that there is an available community facility or private residence that is least restrictive, appropriate and consistent with the needs of the individual.

“Medically fragile” means an individual with a developmental disability and a chronic medical condition that is characterized by periods of acute exacerbation or potentially life-threatening episodes and that may require frequent hospitalizations or prolonged recuperation periods and ongoing monitoring and assistance by a licensed registered nurse.

“Private residence” means a certified family home or a single family dwelling or apartment in a multiple dwelling or apartment complex that is used by an individual as a place of abode and that is not used for commercial purposes.

“Resident” means an individual who is admitted to or resides at the southwest Idaho treatment center.

“Transfer” means relocating and moving a person who is a resident of the southwest Idaho treatment center from that institution to a community facility or private residence or from one (1) community facility or private residence to another. Transfer does not include relocating or moving a resident of the southwest Idaho treatment center between rooms or beds within the southwest Idaho treatment center.

§ 56-235. Southwest Idaho treatment center.

The establishment by law of the southwest Idaho treatment center at Nampa, Idaho, is hereby ratified and affirmed, and its operation continued; provided, however, that on and after the effective date of this act, the treatment center shall be in the general supervision, control and government of the state department of health and welfare. All rights and title to property, real and personal, belonging to or vested in the state board of health [and welfare] are hereby transferred and vested in the state department of health and welfare. The state department is empowered to acquire, by purchase or exchange, any property which in the judgment of the department is needful for the operation of the treatment center, and to dispose of, by sale or exchange, any property which in the judgment of the department is not needful for the operation of the same. The department of health and welfare shall have authority to administer the treatment center, to employ and release such personnel as are required for the operation of the treatment center, fix salaries, and to perform any other necessary and proper functions in the efficient and beneficial operation of the treatment center.

§ 56-235A. Prohibitions, restrictions and limitations on admission.

The southwest Idaho treatment center shall not admit, accept or receive any person unless an admission-discharge committee determines that:

The individual has a developmental disability;

The individual meets the level of care requirements and active treatment requirements for admission to an intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities;

All community facilities, options and supports have been exhausted, and there is no available community facility or private residence that is least restrictive, appropriate and consistent with the needs of the individual; and

The southwest Idaho treatment center is the least restrictive available residential placement consistent with the needs of the individual after considering all available and appropriate community facilities and private residences.

The director may limit admissions and establish admission priorities to the southwest Idaho treatment center through rulemaking in order to ensure that expenditures for services do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the department to the facility. The southwest Idaho treatment center may refuse any applicant for voluntary admission.

Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to:

Temporary emergency admissions or placements for crisis stabilization only, for up to ninety (90) days, that are preauthorized by the director; or

Admissions or placements made by the director pursuant to section 66-406, Idaho Code.

§ 56-235B. Discharge planning — Authorization to discharge.

The director may discharge a resident of the southwest Idaho treatment center on such terms and conditions as the director may determine whenever an admission-discharge committee determines there is an available community facility or private residence that is least restrictive, appropriate and consistent with the individual’s needs. The director shall use reasonable efforts to discharge a resident to a community facility or private residence where the individual can be readily visited by those persons interested in his well-being.

§ 56-235C. Notice of discharge — Request for hearing.

Before a discharge plan is implemented, the resident and the resident’s spouse, guardian, adult next of kin or friend, if any, shall be given an opportunity to participate in the development and review of the admission-discharge committee’s discharge plan.

If, after reasonable efforts have been exhausted, the resident or the resident’s spouse, guardian, adult next of kin or friend, if any, does not agree with the admission-discharge committee’s discharge plan, ninety (90) days prior to discharge, written notice shall be filed with the committing court, if any, and served by registered or certified mail upon the resident, resident’s attorney, and either the resident’s spouse, guardian, adult next of kin or friend, if any. The written notice must include a statement advising the resident of the right to request a hearing by the director and must also include a statement advising the resident of the right to judicial review.

Within fifteen (15) days from receipt of the notice of discharge, the resident may serve a written request for hearing upon the director. Upon receipt of such request, the director shall fix a date for hearing, which date shall not be more than thirty (30) days from receipt of the request, and shall give the resident at least fifteen (15) days’ written notice of said hearing date. Within thirty (30) days after the conclusion of the hearing, the director shall notify the resident in writing by registered or certified mail of his decision. A transfer shall not be implemented during any period in which a request for hearing is pending and undecided by the director. If no request for hearing is made within fifteen (15) days from receipt of the notice of discharge, the director may discharge the resident.

The director shall periodically monitor the adjustment of the former resident to his transfer to a community facility or private residence. If within ninety (90) days following a transfer to a community facility or private residence, an admission-discharge committee determines that the former resident is not adjusting to the transfer and there is no other available community facility or private residence least restrictive, appropriate and consistent with the needs of the former resident, the director may make the determination that the former resident be readmitted to the southwest Idaho treatment center in accordance with section 56-235A, Idaho Code.

§ 56-235D. Appeals.

If a former resident feels aggrieved by a decision of the director rendered pursuant to a hearing as provided in section 56-235C, Idaho Code, appeal may be taken to the committing court or the court of the county in which such former resident is present. Appeal must be taken in the manner and form set forth in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, provided however, the filing of a notice of appeal with the court shall not, unless otherwise ordered, stay the resident’s discharge or the decision of the director.

§ 56-235E. Rulemaking authority.

The director, in addition to other duties imposed by law, is hereby authorized and directed through rulemaking to establish procedures necessary to implement these provisions. The rulemaking authority granted in this section shall be limited to the specific standards and procedures required by sections 56-234 through 56-235D, Idaho Code.

§ 56-236. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho Health Insurance Access Card Act.”

§ 56-237. Purpose.

The purpose and intent of this act is to promote the availability of health insurance to children and families and to adults who are employed by small businesses in Idaho and their dependent spouses whose families’ modified adjusted gross incomes fall within one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the federal poverty guidelines.

§ 56-238. Definitions.

As used in sections 56-236 through 56-242, Idaho Code:

“CHIP Plan A” means the existing Idaho children’s health insurance program for children eligible under federal title XXI whose families’ modified adjusted gross incomes do not exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty guidelines.

“CHIP Plan B” means the program created in section 56-239, Idaho Code.

“Department” means the state department of health and welfare.

“Director” means the director of the state department of health and welfare.

“Eligible adult” means a person:

Over eighteen (18) years of age living in Idaho;

Whose family’s modified adjusted gross income is less than one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty guidelines;

Who is employed full time by a small employer, meaning an employer with two (2) to fifty (50) employees and as such term is defined in section 41-4703, Idaho Code, and who is eligible for health insurance coverage under a small employer health benefit plan regulated under chapter 47, title 41, Idaho Code, or the dependent spouse of such employee; and

Who does not qualify for comparable or greater assistance through other federal or state health insurance or premium assistance programs.

“Eligible child” means a child under nineteen (19) years of age living in Idaho whose family’s modified adjusted gross income falls within federal poverty guidelines for medicaid, CHIP Plan A or CHIP Plan B.

“Health benefit plan” means any hospital or medical policy or certificate, any subscriber contract provided by a hospital or professional service corporation, or managed care organization subscriber contract. Health benefit plan does not include policies or certificates of insurance for specific disease, hospital confinement indemnity, accident-only, credit, dental, vision, medicare supplement, long-term care, or disability income insurance, student health benefits only coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, worker’s compensation or similar insurance, automobile medical payment insurance or nonrenewable short-term coverage issued for a period of twelve (12) months or less.

“Modified adjusted gross income” means individual or family income as defined for state medicaid programs in the social security act and the Internal Revenue Code.

“Small business health insurance pilot program” means the program created in section 56-241, Idaho Code.

§ 56-239. CHIP Plan B.

There is hereby created in the department a CHIP Plan B that shall be made available by the department to eligible children, as defined in section 56-238, Idaho Code, whose family’s modified adjusted gross income is between one hundred fifty percent (150%) and one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the federal poverty guidelines. The director shall implement the program by adopting rules recommended by the board of the Idaho individual high risk reinsurance pool created in section 41-5502, Idaho Code, that authorize policies of health insurance for children enrolled in the CHIP Plan B.

There is hereby created a CHIP Plan B advisory board which shall advise the Idaho individual high risk reinsurance pool board concerning issues related to the CHIP Plan B. The board shall consist of eight (8) members, four (4) members to be appointed by the director and four (4) members to be appointed by the governor. At least two (2) members of the board shall be parents of children who are eligible to participate in the CHIP Plan B.

§ 56-240. Children’s access card program. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 80, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 56-241. Small business health insurance pilot program.

There is hereby created in the department a small business health insurance pilot program that shall be made available for up to one thousand (1,000) eligible adults, as defined in section 56-238, Idaho Code, based on available funding. The director shall implement the program by adopting rules recommended by the board of the Idaho individual high risk reinsurance pool created in section 41-5502, Idaho Code, providing for the payment of the benefit authorized in subsection (2) of this section through the use of the Idaho health insurance access card.

The small business health insurance pilot program shall, through the Idaho health insurance access card program, pay to the insurance company providing insurance coverage through policies regulated under chapter 47, title 41, Idaho Code, for an adult enrolled in the small employer health insurance pilot program, for each month the insurance coverage is in effect, a one hundred dollar ($100) payment to be applied to the monthly insurance premium billed each month by the insurance company.

Participation in the small business health insurance pilot program by any employer shall be optional. Nothing in sections 56-236 through 56-242, Idaho Code, shall be construed to mandate or require that an employer participate in the pilot program. Small employers who choose to participate in the small business health insurance pilot program shall meet insurance carriers’ contribution and participation guidelines.

There is hereby created a small business health insurance advisory board which shall advise the Idaho individual high risk reinsurance pool board concerning issues related to the small business health insurance pilot program. The board shall consist of eight (8) members, four (4) members to be appointed by the director and four (4) members to be appointed by the governor. At least four (4) members of the board shall be representatives of small businesses, meaning those with two (2) to fifty (50) employees, that offer employee health benefit plans regulated under chapter 47, title 41, Idaho Code.

The department shall limit assistance under the small business health insurance pilot program to those who do not have access to comparable or better coverage under other federal or state programs.

§ 56-242. Idaho health insurance access card.

The director shall develop an Idaho health insurance access card program in the department to implement the small business health insurance pilot program.

There is hereby created and established in the state treasury a fund to be known as the “Idaho health insurance access card fund.” Moneys in the fund shall be maintained in two (2) subaccounts, identified respectively as the “CHIP Plan B subaccount” and the “small business health insurance pilot program subaccount.” Appropriations, matching federal funds, grants, donations and moneys from other sources shall be paid into the fund. The department shall administer the fund. Any interest earned on the investment of idle moneys in the fund shall be returned to and deposited in the fund.
(2)(a) There is hereby created and established in the state treasury a fund to be known as the “Idaho health insurance access card fund.” Moneys in the fund shall be maintained in two (2) subaccounts, identified respectively as the “CHIP Plan B subaccount” and the “small business health insurance pilot program subaccount.” Appropriations, matching federal funds, grants, donations and moneys from other sources shall be paid into the fund. The department shall administer the fund. Any interest earned on the investment of idle moneys in the fund shall be returned to and deposited in the fund.

Moneys in the CHIP Plan B subaccount and the small business health insurance pilot program subaccount shall be expended pursuant to appropriation for the payment of benefits and capped administrative costs of the department.

The director shall manage waivers of federal title XXI and title XIX to subsidize health care coverage under the CHIP Plan B and the small business health insurance pilot program. Federal matching funds received by the department to provide coverage under CHIP Plan B and the small business health insurance pilot program shall be deposited in the appropriate subaccount.

The director is authorized to promulgate rules recommended by the board of the Idaho individual high risk reinsurance pool to implement the CHIP Plan B and the small business health insurance pilot program.

Insurers offering health benefit plans regulated under chapter 47, title 41, Idaho Code, shall accept payment for such plans under the small business health insurance pilot program pursuant to rules promulgated by the department.

The department shall limit assistance under the Idaho health insurance access card program to those who do not have access to comparable or better coverage under other federal or state programs.

§ 56-243, 56-244. Civil rights of residents — Individual treatment plan. [Repealed.]

§ 56-245 — 56-249. [Reserved.]

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho Medicaid Simplification Act.”

§ 56-251. Legislative intent.

The legislature finds that the current federal medicaid law and regulations have not kept pace with modern health care management practices, create obstacles to quality care and impose unnecessary costs on the delivery of effective and efficient health care. The legislature believes that the state of Idaho must strive to balance efforts to contain medicaid costs, improve program quality and improve access to services. The legislature further believes that the state of Idaho could achieve improved health outcomes for medicaid participants by simplifying eligibility and developing health benefits for medicaid participants according to their health needs, including appropriate preventive and wellness services.

The legislature supports development, at a minimum, of the following health-need categories:

Low-Income Children and Working-Age Adults with No Special Health Needs. The broad policy goal for the medicaid program for low-income children and working-age adults with no special health needs is to achieve and maintain wellness by emphasizing prevention and by proactively managing health. Additional specific goals are:

To emphasize preventive care and wellness;

To increase participant ability to make good health choices; and

To strengthen the employer-based health insurance system.

Persons with Disabilities or Special Health Needs. The broad policy goal for the medicaid program for persons with disabilities or special health needs is to finance and deliver cost-effective individualized care. Additional specific goals are:

To emphasize preventive care and wellness;

To empower individuals with disabilities to manage their own lives;

To provide opportunities for employment for persons with disabilities; and

To provide and to promote family-centered, community-based, coordinated care for children with special health care needs.

Persons with Medicare and Medicaid Coverage. The broad policy goal for the medicaid program for persons with medicare and medicaid coverage is to finance and deliver cost-effective individualized care which is integrated, to the greatest extent possible, with medicare coverage. Additional specific goals are:

To emphasize preventive care and wellness;

To improve coordination between medicaid and medicare coverage;

To increase nonpublic financing options for long-term care; and

To ensure participants’ dignity and quality of life.

To the extent practicable, the department shall achieve savings and efficiencies through use of modern care management practices, in areas such as network management, cost-sharing, benefit design and premium assistance.

The department’s duty to implement these changes in accordance with the intent of the legislature is contingent upon federal approval.

§ 56-252. Definitions.

As used in sections 56-250 through 56-255, Idaho Code:

“Benchmark plan” means a package of health benefits coverage that provides coverage for a specified population in accordance with section 6044 of the deficit reduction act of 2005.

“Benefit design” means selection of services, providers and beneficiary cost-sharing to create the scope of coverage for participants.

“Community supports” means services that promote the ability of persons with disabilities to be self-sufficient and live independently in their own communities.

“Cost-sharing” means participant payment for a portion of medicaid service costs such as deductibles, coinsurance or copayment amounts.

“Department” means the department of health and welfare.

“Director” means the director of the department of health and welfare.

“Health risk assessment” means a process of assessing the health status and health needs of participants.

“Medicaid” means Idaho’s medical assistance program.

“Medical assistance” means payments for part or all of the cost of services funded by titles XIX or XXI of the federal social security act as amended, as may be designated by department rule.

“Medical home” means a primary care case manager designated by the participant or the department to coordinate the participant’s care.

“Network management” means establishment and management of contracts between the department and limited groups of providers or suppliers of medical and other services to participants.

“Participant” means a person eligible for and enrolled in the Idaho medical assistance program.

“Premium assistance” means use of medicaid funds to pay part or all of the costs of enrolling eligible individuals into private insurance coverage.

“Primary care case manager” means a primary care physician who contracts with medicaid to coordinate the care of certain participants.

“Provider” means any individual, partnership, association, corporation or organization, public or private, which provides residential or assisted living services, certified family home services, nursing facility services or services offered pursuant to medical assistance.

“Self-determination” means medicaid services that allow persons with disabilities to exercise choice and control over the services and supports they receive.

“State plan” means the contract between the state and federal government under 42 U.S.C. section 1396a(a).

§ 56-253. Powers and duties of the director.

The director is hereby encouraged and empowered to obtain federal approval in order that Idaho design and implement changes to its medicaid program that advance the quality of services to participants while allowing access to needed services and containing excessive costs. The design of Idaho’s medicaid program shall incorporate the concepts expressed in section 56-251, Idaho Code.

The director may create health-need categories other than those stated in section 56-251(2)(a), Idaho Code, subject to legislative approval, and may develop a medicaid benchmark plan for each category.

Each benchmark plan shall include explicit policy goals for the covered population identified in the plan, as well as specific benefit packages, delivery system components and performance measures in accordance with section 67-1904, Idaho Code.

The director shall establish a mechanism to ensure placement of participants into the appropriate benchmark plan as allowed under section 6044 of the deficit reduction act of 2005. This mechanism shall include, but not be limited to, a health risk assessment. This assessment shall comply with federal requirements for early and periodic screening, diagnosis and treatment (EPSDT) services for children, in accordance with section 1905(a)(4)(B) of the social security act. The health risk assessment shall include questions related to substance use disorders to allow referral to treatment for such disorders by the department.

The director may require, subject to federal approval, participants to designate a medical home. Applicants for medical assistance shall receive information about primary care case management and, if required to so designate, shall select a primary care provider as part of the eligibility determination process.

The director may, subject to federal approval, enter into contracts for medical and other services when such contracts are beneficial to participant health outcomes as well as economically prudent for the medicaid program.

The director may obtain agreements from medicare, school districts and other entities to provide medical care if it is practical and cost-effective.

The director shall research options and apply for federal waivers to enable cost-efficient use of medicaid funds to pay for substance abuse and/or mental health services in institutions for mental disease.

The director shall, in cooperation with the director of the department of insurance, seek waivers from the federal government to provide that persons eligible for medicaid pursuant to section 56-267, Idaho Code, who have a modified adjusted gross income at or above one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty level shall receive the advance premium tax credit to purchase a qualified health plan through the Idaho health insurance exchange established by chapter 61, title 41, Idaho Code, instead of enrolling in medicaid, except as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

A person described in this subsection may choose to enroll in medicaid instead of receiving the advance premium tax credit to purchase a qualified health plan.

If the waivers described in this subsection are not approved before January 1, 2020, then the persons described in this subsection shall be enrolled in medicaid.
(10) The director shall seek a waiver from the federal government consistent with the provisions of this subsection.

Working at least twenty (20) hours per week, averaged monthly, or earning wages equal to or greater than the federal minimum wage for twenty (20) hours of work per week;

Participating in and complying with the requirements of a work training program at least twenty (20) hours per week, as determined by the department;

Volunteering at least twenty (20) hours per week, as determined by the department;

Enrolled at least half-time in postsecondary education or another recognized education program, as determined by the department, and remaining enrolled and attending classes during normal class cycles;

Meeting any combination of working, volunteering, and participating in a work program for a total of at least twenty (20) hours per week, as determined by the department; or

Subject to and complying with the requirements of the work program for temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) or participating and complying with the requirements of a workfare program in the supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP).

Under the age of nineteen (19) years;

Over the age of fifty-nine (59) years;

Physically or intellectually unable to work;

Pregnant;

A parent or caretaker who is the primary caregiver of a dependent child under the age of eighteen (18) years, as determined by the department;

A parent or caretaker personally providing care for a person with serious medical conditions or with a disability, as determined by the department;

Applying for or receiving unemployment compensation and complying with work requirements that are part of the federal-state unemployment insurance program;

Applying for social security disability benefits, until such time eligibility is determined;

Participating in a drug addiction or alcohol treatment and rehabilitation program, as determined by the department; or

An American Indian or Alaska native who is eligible for services through the Indian health service or through a tribal health program pursuant to the Indian self-determination and education assistance act and the Indian health care improvement act.

The department shall verify a medicaid participant’s compliance with paragraph (a) of this subsection every six (6) months and shall promulgate rules based on federal final waiver approval relating to the requirements of this subsection. A person who fails to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:

Be ineligible for medicaid but may reapply for medicaid two (2) months after such determination is made or earlier if in compliance; or

If the provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph are not federally approved or are found unlawful by a court of competent jurisdiction, be subject to the maximum allowable copayments on covered Idaho medicaid services for a period of six (6) months or until the person complies with paragraph (a) of this subsection, whichever is earlier.

It is the intent of the legislature, in enacting the requirements of this subsection, to enable coverage of medicaid participants while also promoting the participants’ health and financial independence.
(e) The department shall implement the waiver described in this subsection as soon as possible once federal approval has been obtained.

(a) A person participating in medicaid pursuant to section 56-267, Idaho Code, must be:

(b) A person is exempt from the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection if the person is:

(11) The director is given authority to promulgate rules consistent with this act.

§ 56-254. Eligibility for medical assistance.

The department shall make payments for medical assistance to, or on behalf of, the following persons eligible for medical assistance.

The benchmark plan for low-income children and working-age adults with no special health needs includes the following persons:

Children in families whose family income does not exceed one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the federal poverty guideline and who meet age-related and other eligibility standards in accordance with department rule;

Pregnant women of any age whose family income does not exceed one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty guideline and who meet other eligibility standards in accordance with department rule, or who meet the presumptive eligibility guidelines in accordance with section 1920 of the social security act;

Infants born to medicaid-eligible pregnant women. Medicaid eligibility must be offered throughout the first year of life as long as the infant remains in the mother’s household and she remains eligible, or would be eligible if she were still pregnant;

Adults in families with dependent children as described in section 1931 of the social security act, who meet the requirements in the state’s assistance to families with dependent children (AFDC) plan in effect on July 16, 1996;

Families who are provided six (6) to twelve (12) months of medicaid coverage following loss of eligibility under section 1931 of the social security act due to earnings, or four (4) months of medicaid coverage following loss of eligibility under section 1931 of the social security act due to an increase in child or spousal support;

Employees of small businesses who meet the definition of “eligible adult” as described in section 56-238, Idaho Code, whose eligibility is limited to the medical assistance program described in section 56-241, Idaho Code;

All other mandatory groups as defined in title XIX of the social security act, if not listed separately in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

The benchmark plan for persons with disabilities or special health needs includes the following persons:

Persons under age sixty-five (65) years eligible in accordance with title XVI of the social security act, as well as persons eligible for aid to the aged, blind and disabled (AABD) under titles I, X and XIV of the social security act;

Persons under age sixty-five (65) years who are in need of the services of a licensed nursing facility, a licensed intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled, a state mental hospital, or home-based and community-based care, whose income does not exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the social security income (SSI) standard and who meet the asset standards and other eligibility standards in accordance with federal law and regulation, Idaho law and department rule;

Certain disabled children described in 42 CFR 435.225 who meet resource limits for aid to the aged, blind and disabled (AABD) and income limits for social security income (SSI) and other eligibility standards in accordance with department rules;

Persons under age sixty-five (65) years who are eligible for services under both titles XVIII and XIX of the social security act;

Children who are eligible under title IV-E of the social security act for subsidized board payments, foster care or adoption subsidies, and children for whom the state has assumed temporary or permanent responsibility and who do not qualify for title IV-E assistance but are in foster care, shelter or emergency shelter care, or subsidized adoption, and who meet eligibility standards in accordance with department rule;

Eligible women under age sixty-five (65) years with incomes at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level, for cancer treatment pursuant to the federal breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment act of 2000;

Low-income children and working-age adults under age sixty-five (65) years who qualify under subsection (1) of this section and who require the services for persons with disabilities or special health needs listed in section 56-255(3), Idaho Code;

Persons over age sixty-five (65) years who choose to enroll in this state plan; and

Effective January 1, 2018, children under eighteen (18) years with serious emotional disturbance, as defined in section 16-2403, Idaho Code, in families whose income does not exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the federal poverty guideline and who meet other eligibility standards in accordance with department rule.

The benchmark plan for persons over twenty-one (21) years of age who have medicare and medicaid coverage includes the following persons:

Persons eligible in accordance with title XVI of the social security act, as well as persons eligible for aid to the aged, blind and disabled (AABD) under titles I, X and XIV of the social security act;

Persons who are in need of the services of a licensed nursing facility, a licensed intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled, a state mental hospital, or home-based and community-based care, whose income does not exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the social security income (SSI) standard and who meet the assets standards and other eligibility standards in accordance with federal and state law and department rule;

Persons who are eligible for services under both titles XVIII and XIX of the social security act who have enrolled in the medicare program; and

Persons who are eligible for services under both titles XVIII and XIX of the social security act and who elect to enroll in this state plan.